Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [289A.081] DIRECT FREE FILING OF INDIVIDUAL RETURNS. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish an electronic filing system through which taxpayers may directly file an electronic individual income tax return free of charge. The commissioner may contract with a software vendor to develop the filing system required under this section, but the vendor must not offer paid tax preparation services for Minnesota individual income taxpayers for tax years that the system is active, and the filing system must be made available on the Department of Revenue website. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent feasible, the commissioner must coordinate the state filing system under this section with any direct file systems established for filing federal tax returns. new text end new text begin (c) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, the filing system established under this section must include the ability to file a sufficient number of tax forms that the commissioner estimates at least 70 percent of resident individual income tax returns could be filed using the system. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DIRECT FREE FILING SYSTEM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for the free filing system under Minnesota Statutes, section 289A.081. new text end